Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authorized local government" means a political subdivision of the state, school district, or special purpose district with public works authority.

(2) "Award" means the formal decision by the state or municipality notifying a responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid of the state's or municipality's acceptance of the bid and intent to enter into a contract with the bidder.

(3) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after advertisement and competitive bid, or a contract awarded under the small works roster process in RCW 39.04.151 through 39.04.154.

(4) "Municipality" means every city, county, town, port district, district, or other public agency authorized by law to require the execution of public work, except drainage districts, diking districts, diking and drainage improvement districts, drainage improvement districts, diking improvement districts, consolidated diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement districts, irrigation districts, or other districts authorized by law for the reclamation or development of waste or undeveloped lands.

(5) "Public work" means all work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property therein. All public works, including maintenance when performed by contract shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW. "Public work" does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or under development agreements entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).

(6) "Responsible bidder" means a contractor who meets the criteria in RCW 39.04.350.

(7) "Small business" means a business meeting certification criteria for size, ownership, control, and personal net worth adopted by the office of minority and women's business enterprises in accordance with RCW 39.19.030.

(8) "State" means the state of Washington and all departments, supervisors, commissioners, and agencies of the state.

(9) "State agency" means the department of enterprise services, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of transportation, any institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the department of enterprise services to engage in construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

[ 2023 c 395 s 2; 2008 c 130 s 16; 2007 c 133 s 1; 2000 c 138 s 102; 1997 c 220 s 402 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997); 1993 c 174 s 1; 1989 c 363 s 5; 1986 c 282 s 1; 1982 c 98 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 177 s 1; 1923 c 183 s 1; RRS s 10322-1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: "The legislature finds the need to increase equity and efficiencies in public works procurement. The legislature further finds that small, minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses are essential to a robust and high-functioning economy, which provides high quality living wage jobs throughout the state. The legislature further finds that public works contracting agencies need a streamlined and effective method for delivering small public works projects while protecting worker rights. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide a small business definition, best practices to be included in inclusion plans, and to update and revise the small and limited works roster process to increase administrative efficiency, to encourage greater participation and utilization by small, minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses, and continue to protect the rights of workers engaging in public works projects." [ 2023 c 395 s 1.]

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: "Sections 1 through 30, 32 through 34, 36, and 37 of this act take effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 395 s 39.]

Purpose—2000 c 138: "The purpose of this act is to establish a common small works roster procedure that state agencies and local governments may use to award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real property." [ 2000 c 138 s 1.]

Part headings not law—2000 c 138: "Part headings used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2000 c 138 s 302.]

Referendum—Other legislation limited—Legislators' personal intent not indicated—Reimbursements for election—Voters' pamphlet, election requirements—1997 c 220: See RCW 36.102.800 through 36.102.803.

Municipalities—Energy audits and efficiency: RCW 43.19.691.